Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB40.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6108(a)(4)(v) and (5) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6108. Relief.(a) General rule.--Subject to subsection (a.1), the court may grant any protection order or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of abuse of the plaintiff or minor children. The order or agreement may include:* * *(4) Awarding temporary custody of or establishing temporary visitation rights with regard to minor children. In determining whether to award temporary custody or establish temporary visitation rights pursuant to this paragraph, the 123456789101112131415161718 court shall consider any risk posed by the defendant to the children as well as risk to the plaintiff. The following shall apply:* * *(v) Nothing in this paragraph shall bar either party from filing a petition for custody under Chapter 53 (relating to child custody) or under the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure.* * *(5) After a hearing in accordance with section 6107(a), directing the defendant to pay financial support to those persons the defendant has a duty to support, requiring the defendant, under sections 4324 (relating to inclusion of spousal medical support) and 4326 (relating to mandatory inclusion of child medical support), to provide health coverage for the minor child and spouse, directing the defendant to pay all of the unreimbursed medical expenses of a spouse or minor child of the defendant to the provider or to the plaintiff when he or she has paid for the medical treatment, and directing the defendant to make or continue to make rent or mortgage payments on the residence of the plaintiff to the extent that the defendant has a duty to support the plaintiff or other dependent household members. The support order shall be temporary, and any beneficiary of the order must file a complaint for support under the provisions of [Chapters] Chapter 43 (relating to support matters generally) and [45 (relating to reciprocal enforcement of support orders)] Parts VIII (relating to uniform interstate family support) and VIII-A (relating to intrastate family support) within two weeks of the date of 20250HB0040PN0019 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the issuance of the protection order. If a complaint for support is not filed, that portion of the protection order requiring the defendant to pay support is void. When there is a subsequent ruling on a complaint for support, the portion of the protection order requiring the defendant to pay support expires.* * *(6.1) (i) Ordering the defendant to wear or attach to the defendant's person an electronic monitoring device if the court deems it necessary to protect the plaintiff or minor children and finds that the plaintiff or minor children are in immediate and present danger of physical abuse.(ii) In determining whether an immediate and present danger of abuse exists, the court shall consider a number of factors, including:(A) Whether the order of protection from abuse is unlikely to achieve its purpose in the absence of an electronic monitoring device.(B) Whether the defendant has previously violated a protection from abuse order.(C) Whether past or present abuse to the plaintiff or minor children resulted in injury.(D) Whether the abuse occurred in public.(E) Whether the abuse includes:(I) threats of abuse or suicide;(II) killing or threatening to kill pets;(III) an escalation of violence;(IV) stalking or obsessive behavior;(V) sexual violence; or20250HB0040PN0019 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (VI) drug or excessive alcohol use.(iii) As used in this paragraph, the term "electronic monitoring device" means active surveillance technology that:(A) Is worn by or attached to a defendant consisting of a single-piece device that immediately notifies law enforcement or other monitors of a violation of the distance requirements or locations that the defendant is barred from entering.(B) Immediately notifies the plaintiff of a violation.(C) Allows law enforcement or monitors to speak to the defendant in some manner through or in conjunction with the device.(D) Has a loud alarm that can be activated to warn the plaintiff of the defendant's presence in a location where the defendant is barred from entering.(E) Can be tracked by either satellite or cellular telephone tower triangulation.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0040PN0019 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021